Utah statutes.
12-1-7.   Exceptions.
This title does not apply to:
(1)  an attorney authorized to practice in this state;
(2)  a national bank;
(3)  a bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of this state; or
(4)  the following licensed under Title 31A, Insurance Code:
(a)  a title insurance agency; or
(b)  a title insurance producer.
